Massachusetts, session 194th, H32.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The subdivision (4) of section 3 of Chapter 32 is hereby amended by 
striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:  
For the purposes of this subdivision the words "service in any other state for any previous 
period as a teacher, principal, supervisor or superintendent in the public day schools or other day 
school under exclusive public control and supervision'' shall be deemed to include service 
rendered in an overseas dependent school conducted under the supervision of the department of 
defense of the government of the United States, and service rendered in the public schools of any 
of the Territories of the United States; provided, that any credit to be allowed shall not exceed 
five years of the maximum credit of ten years allowable for service in other states as provided in 
this section.